Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1810
Committee or hearing officer; proceedings; powers; applicants; rights.

(1) The committee or a hearing officer may hold hearings, sit and act at the times and places and take the testimony that the committee or the hearing officer considers advisable, and administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses. The hearing officer or the committee shall have full powers by subpoena to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of any relevant evidence, but no subpoena shall be issued unless signed by a member of the committee. Application to a court for aid in enforcing the subpoena may be made in the name of the committee by any committee member.

(2) The applicant and any other person having a substantial interest in the proceeding may appear and be heard, produce evidence, and cross-examine witnesses in person or by an attorney. The committee or a hearing officer may hear other persons who in its or his or her judgment may have relevant evidence to submit.

(3) The committee or a hearing officer shall have access to criminal history record information, as defined in section 29-3506, and investigative information of the law enforcement agency which handled the offense which is the basis for the victim's application for compensation.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 10;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 11.